Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) This section applies to the City of Bandon, the City  of North Bend and
the City of Reedsport.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of the  city’s charter or code to the contrary, fees,
rates or any other charges imposed for municipal water and  wastewater services provided
by the city may be set by a majority vote of the governing body of the city.
Passed by Senate April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1062 (SB 1062-A) Page 1